Utah statutes.
4-39-107.   Powers of state veterinarian.
The state veterinarian shall:
(1)  set up periodic or ongoing surveillance programs considered necessary
for:
(a)  the recognition, control, monitoring, and elimination of infectious
diseases and parasites; and
(b)  monitoring genetic purity; and
(2)  quarantine or make any disposition of diseased animals that he or she
considers necessary for the control or eradication of that disease.
